South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3770.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 48-39-130(D)(8) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (8) Normal maintenance or repair to any pier or walkwaypermitted or grandfathered structure provided that suchthe maintenance or repair does not involve dredge or fill and extends only to the original dimensions of the structure. An as-built survey of the structure must be provided to the department within sixty days of maintenance or repair completion. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----